Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.115.040

Technical assistance for rural communities and counties—Marketing plan.

(1) The department may provide technical assistance to rural communities desiring to become sponsoring communities for the purposes of identification of prospective students for the health professional loan repayment and scholarship program, assisting prospective students to apply to an eligible education and training program, making formal agreements with prospective students to provide credentialed health care services in the community, forming agreements between rural communities in a service area to share credentialed health care professionals, and fulfilling any matching requirements.

(2) The department, in consultation with the council and other pertinent stakeholders, may provide technical assistance to counties desiring to become sponsoring communities for the purposes of identification of prospective students for the forensic pathology loan repayment program, assisting prospective students to apply to an eligible education and training program, making formal agreements with prospective students to provide services as a board-certified forensic pathologist, forming agreements between rural and underserved counties in a service area to share credentialed forensic pathology professionals, and fulfilling any matching requirements.

(3) From the amounts appropriated to the department, the department shall enter into a contract for a two-year marketing plan with the Washington association of coroners and medical examiners for the sole purpose of marketing Washington state to potential board-certified forensic pathologists. The marketing plan must include, but is not limited to, a focus on rural and underserved counties. Payment for administrative expenses may not exceed two percent of the appropriated funds.

[ 2023 c 442 s 4; 2019 c 302 s 4; 1991 c 332 s 17.]

NOTES:

Intent—2023 c 442: See note following RCW 28B.115.020.